Maryland, session 2026, HB1126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1126*

HOUSE BILL 1126
(a) The provisions of § 15–112(b)(1)(ii) and (2), (f) through (m), (r), (s), [and] (u)
through (w), AND (Y) of the Insurance Article (Provider panels) shall apply to managed
care organizations in the same manner they apply to carriers.
Article – Insurance
15–112.
(Y) A CARRIER THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR LABORATORY SERVICES
UNDER HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE
MAY NOT:
(1) PROHIBIT AN ENROLLEE FROM SELECTING, OR LIMIT THE ABILITY
OF AN ENROLLEE TO SELECT, A LABORATORY OF THE ENROLLEE’S CHOICE FOR THE
RECEIPT OF LABORATORY SERVICES IF THE LABORATORY PARTICIPATES AS A
CONTRACT PROVIDER IN THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN OFFERED BY THE CARRIER;
(2) DENY A LABORATORY THE RIGHT TO PARTICIPATE AS A CONTRACT
PROVIDER UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN IF THE LABORATORY AGREES TO:
(I) PROVIDE LABORATORY SERVICES IN A MANNER THAT
MEETS THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN; AND
(II) THE TERMS OF REIMBURSEMENT ESTABLISHED BY THE
CARRIER UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN; OR
(3) FOR LABORATORY SERVICES PROVIDED TO AN ENROLLEE UNDER
A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN THAT ARE RECEIVED FROM A CONTRACT PROVIDER,
IMPOSE ON THE ENROLLEE A COPAYMENT, FEE, OR CONDITION NOT IMPOSED ON
ALL OTHER ENROLLEES FOR THE SAME LABORATORY UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT
PLAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.